Maryland, session 2025, SB1046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1046*

SENATE BILL 1046
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–402.
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(c) (11) (i) 1. In this paragraph the following words have the meanings
indicated.
2. “Body–worn digital recording device” means a device worn
on the person of a law enforcement officer OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER that is capable of
recording video and intercepting oral communications.
3. “Electronic control device” has the meaning stated in §
4–109 of the Criminal Law Article.
(ii) It is lawful under this subtitle for a law enforcement officer OR
CORRECTIONAL OFFICER in the course of the officer’s regular duty to intercept an oral
communication with a body–worn digital recording device or an electronic control device
capable of recording video and oral communications if:
1. The law enforcement officer OR CORRECTIONAL
OFFICER is in uniform or prominently displaying the officer’s badge or other insignia;
2. The law enforcement officer OR CORRECTIONAL
OFFICER is making reasonable efforts to:
A. FOR A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, conform to
standards in accordance with § 3–511 of the Public Safety Article for the use of body–worn
digital recording devices or electronic control devices capable of recording video and oral
communications; OR

SENATE BILL 1046 3
B. FOR A CORRECTIONAL OFFICER, CONFORM TO
STANDARDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–211 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
ARTICLE FOR THE USE OF BODY–WORN DIGITAL RECORDING DEVICES OR
ELECTRONIC CONTROL DEVICES CAPABLE OF RECORDING VIDEO AND ORAL
COMMUNICATIONS;
3. The law enforcement officer OR CORRECTIONAL
OFFICER is a party to the oral communication;
4. Law enforcement OR THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICER
notifies, as soon as is practicable, the individual that the individual is being recorded,
unless it is unsafe, impractical, or impossible to do so; and
5. The oral interception is being made as part of a videotape
or digital recording.
(iii) Failure to notify under subparagraph (ii)4 of this paragraph does
not affect the admissibility in court of the recording if the failure to notify involved an
individual who joined a discussion in progress for which proper notification was previously
given.
Article – Correctional Services
8–211.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP
AND PUBLISH ONLINE A POLICY FOR ADOPTION BY THE MANAGING OFFICIAL OF
EACH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY FOR THE TRAINING, ISSUANCE, AND USE OF A
BODY–WORN CAMERA BY A CORRECTIONAL OFFICER THAT ADDRESSES:
(1) THE TESTING OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS TO ENSURE ADEQUATE
FUNCTIONING;
(2) THE PROCEDURE FOR THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICER TO FOLLOW
IF THE CAMERA FAILS TO PROPERLY OPERATE AT THE BEGINNING OF OR DURING
THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICER’S SHIFT;
(3) WHEN RECORDING IS MANDATORY;
(4) WHEN RECORDING IS PROHIBITED;
(5) WHEN RECORDING IS DISCRETIONARY;
(6) WHEN RECORDING MAY REQUIRE CONSENT OF A SUBJECT BEING
RECORDED;

SENATE BILL 1046
(7) WHEN A RECORDING MAY BE ENDED;
(8) PROVIDING NOTICE OF RECORDING;
(9) ACCESS TO AND CONFIDENTIALITY OF RECORDINGS;
(10) THE SECURE STORAGE OF DATA FROM A BODY–WORN CAMERA;
(11) REVIEW AND USE OF RECORDINGS;
(12) RETENTION OF RECORDINGS;
(13) DISSEMINATION AND RELEASE OF RECORDINGS;
(14) CONSEQUENCES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE FACILITY’S
BODY–WORN CAMERA POLICY;
(15) NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS WHEN ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL
BECOMES A PARTY TO THE COMMUNICATION FOLLOWING THE INITIAL
NOTIFICATION;
(16) SPECIFIC PROTECTIONS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHEN THERE IS AN
EXPECTATION OF PRIVACY IN PRIVATE OR PUBLIC PLACES;
(17) PROCEDURES FOR A CORRECTIONAL OFFICER WHO REGULARLY
INTERACTS WITH MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC AS PART OF THE CORRECTIONAL
OFFICER’S OFFICIAL DUTIES; AND
(18) ANY ADDITIONAL ISSUES DETERMINED TO BE RELEVANT IN THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS BY CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS.
(B) (1) THE SECRETARY AND THE MANAGING OFFICIAL OF EACH
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A WRITTEN POLICY
CONSISTENT WITH THE POLICY PUBLISHED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS.
(2) A POLICY DEVELOPED AND MAINTAINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL SPECIFY WHICH CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS EMPLOYED
BY THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY ARE REQUIRED TO USE BODY–WORN CAMERAS.

SENATE BILL 1046 5
(C) A BODY–WORN CAMERA THAT POSSESSES THE REQUISITE
TECHNOLOGICAL CAPABILITY SHALL AUTOMATICALLY RECORD AND SAVE AT LEAST
60 SECONDS OF VIDEO FOOTAGE IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO THE OFFICER ACTIVATING
THE RECORD BUTTON ON THE DEVICE.
(D) POLICIES ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT
BE NEGATED OR ALTERED THROUGH COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.